Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2087.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 28-736, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-736. Use of highway lanes; restrictions A. If the department or a local authority determines on the basis of an engineering and traffic investigation of a highway under its jurisdiction that the designation of a specific lane or lanes for travel of the vehicles prescribed in subsection B of this section would facilitate the safe and orderly movement of traffic, the department or local authority may designate a specific lane or lanes for the travel of those vehicles and shall erect signs at reasonable intervals giving notice of those lanes. B. The following vehicles shall be driven in the lane or lanes designated pursuant to subsection A of this section if signs are erected giving notice of that designation: 1. A motor vehicle or vehicle combination with a declared gross weight of more than twenty-six thousand pounds, excluding a motor vehicle designed for carrying sixteen or more passengers, including the driver.  For the purposes of this paragraph, "declared gross weight" and "vehicle combination" have the same meaning meanings prescribed in section 28-5431. 2. A vehicle that is drawing a pole trailer that weighs six thousand or more pounds. C. Except as otherwise provided in this section, on a divided highway that has three or more clearly marked lanes for traffic in one direction, excluding any hov lanes, if a specific lane or lanes have not been designated pursuant to subsection A of this section, a vehicle prescribed in subsection B of this section shall not be driven in the extreme left-hand lane for traffic. C. D. This section does not apply to a driver who is preparing for a left-hand or right-hand turn, who is entering or exiting a highway or who must necessarily drive in a lane other than the designated lane to continue on the driver's intended route. END_STATUTE